New York, session 2025-2026, S4219.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The Muslim American Advisory Council. The New York State 2 Muslim American Advisory Council is hereby established. It will advise 3 the legislature on ways to advance the role and civic participation of 4 Muslim Americans in New York. Additionally, the Muslim American Advisory 5 Council (hereinafter referred to as the "Council") shall recommend stra- 6 tegies to better integrate Muslims in New York socially, educationally, 7 culturally and economically. The Council shall facilitate relationship- 8 building in the Muslim community to achieve goals related to interna- 9 tional commerce in Muslim countries/communities, and identify ways to 10 more effectively disseminate information and outreach to Muslim Ameri- 11 cans regarding state programs and services. The Council shall advise the 12 legislature on appropriate policy developments, official directives, and 13 other issues of significance impacting New York's Muslims. It will bring 14 important faith-based issues based on factual findings to the legisla- 15 ture's attention and make recommendations to address those issues. It 16 will also strengthen communication between the state and Muslim leader- 17 ship and the general community. 18 § 2. The Council shall consist of ten members, as follows: 19 a. five members shall be representatives of community-based/faith- 20 based organizations that advise or assist Muslim American communities. 21 b. one member shall be appointed by the temporary president of the 22 senate. 23 c. one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of the senate. 24 d. one member shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07856-01-5 S. 4219 2 1 e. one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of the assem- 2 bly. 3 f. one remaining member shall be appointed by the governor. 4 § 3. Each member of the Council shall serve for a term of four years 5 or until their successor is appointed. A member appointed to fill a 6 vacancy shall serve the remainder of the term of the member they are 7 appointed to succeed. 8 § 4. The members of the Council shall receive no compensation for 9 their services but shall be reimbursed for their expenses actually and 10 necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties hereunder. 11 § 5. The Council shall select a chair and a secretary from among the 12 members. 13 § 6. The Council shall meet as frequently as necessary, but not less 14 than four times per year. Such meetings shall be held at such locations 15 as the Council may determine. All such meetings shall be subject to the 16 open meetings law. 17 § 7. Each member of the Council shall be entitled to designate in 18 writing a representative to attend meetings in their place and to vote 19 or otherwise act on their behalf in their absence. 20 § 8. The Council will present strategies to the legislature to better 21 integrate Muslims in New York socially, educationally, culturally and 22 economically in writing in the form of an annual report approximately 23 sixteen months from the establishment of the Council and annually there- 24 after. 25 § 9. The report shall consist of factual findings, progress analyses, 26 and recommendations regarding the implementation of state programs and 27 services as it affects Muslim Americans. 28 § 10. This act shall take effect immediately.